src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4488 N 1
SFX 4488 ko czōm .
SFX 4489 N 1
SFX 4489 ko czōw .
SFX 4490 N 1
SFX 4490 ko czy .
SFX 4491 N 1
SFX 4491 oć alibymy .
SFX 4492 N 1
SFX 4492 oć alibyście .
SFX 4493 N 1
SFX 4493 oć aliby .
SFX 4494 N 1
SFX 4494 oć alichmy .
SFX 4495 N 1
SFX 4495 oć alimy .
SFX 4496 N 1
SFX 4496 oć aliście .
SFX 4497 N 1
SFX 4497 oć ali .
SFX 4498 N 1
SFX 4498 oć ałabych .
SFX 4499 N 1
SFX 4499 oć ałabyś .
SFX 4500 N 1
SFX 4500 oć ałaby .
SFX 4501 N 1
SFX 4501 oć ałach .
SFX 4502 N 1
SFX 4502 oć ałaś .
SFX 4503 N 1
SFX 4503 oć ała .
SFX 4504 N 1
SFX 4504 oć ałoby .
SFX 4505 N 1
SFX 4505 oć ało .
SFX 4506 N 1
SFX 4506 oć ałybymy .
SFX 4507 N 1
SFX 4507 oć ałybyście .
SFX 4508 N 1
SFX 4508 oć ałyby .
SFX 4509 N 1
SFX 4509 oć ałychmy .
SFX 4510 N 1
SFX 4510 oć ałymy .
SFX 4511 N 1
SFX 4511 oć ałyście .
SFX 4512 N 1
SFX 4512 oć ały .
SFX 4513 N 1
SFX 4513 sno śnie .
SFX 4514 N 1
SFX 4514 yj 0 .
SFX 4515 N 1
SFX 4515 ōw owiach .
SFX 4516 N 1
SFX 4516 ōw owiami .
SFX 4517 N 1
SFX 4517 ōw owiowi .
SFX 4518 N 1
SFX 4518 ōw owiōm .
SFX 4519 N 1
SFX 4519 ōw owiōw .
SFX 4520 N 1
SFX 4520 ōw owiu .
SFX 4521 N 1
SFX 4521 ōw owiym .
SFX 4522 N 1
SFX 4522 ioł ale .
SFX 4523 N 1
SFX 4523 ioł ałach .
SFX 4524 N 1
SFX 4524 ioł ałami .
SFX 4525 N 1
SFX 4525 ioł ałowi .
SFX 4526 N 1
SFX 4526 ioł ałōm .
SFX 4527 N 1
SFX 4527 ioł ałōw .
SFX 4528 N 1
SFX 4528 ioł ału .
SFX 4529 N 1
SFX 4529 ioł ałym .
SFX 4530 N 1
SFX 4530 ioł ały .
SFX 4531 N 1
SFX 4531 ioł oł .
SFX 4532 N 1
SFX 4532 abnōńć obłech .
SFX 4533 N 1
SFX 4533 abnōńć ob .
SFX 4534 N 1
SFX 4534 c ga .
SFX 4535 N 1
SFX 4535 c gōm .
SFX 4536 N 1
SFX 4536 c żecie .
SFX 4537 N 1
SFX 4537 c żesz .
SFX 4538 N 1
SFX 4538 c że .
SFX 4539 N 1
SFX 4539 c żōncego .
SFX 4540 N 1
SFX 4540 c żōnce .
SFX 4541 N 1
SFX 4541 c żōnco .
SFX 4542 N 1
SFX 4542 c żōncōm .
SFX 4543 N 1
SFX 4543 c żōnc .
SFX 4544 N 1
SFX 4544 c żōncych .
SFX 4545 N 1
SFX 4545 c żōncyj .
SFX 4546 N 1
SFX 4546 c żōncymi .
SFX 4547 N 1
SFX 4547 c żōncymu .
SFX 4548 N 1
SFX 4548 c żōncym .
SFX 4549 N 1
SFX 4549 c żōncy .
SFX 4550 N 1
SFX 4550 c żōnego .
SFX 4551 N 1
SFX 4551 c żōne .
SFX 4552 N 1
SFX 4552 c żōno .
SFX 4553 N 1
SFX 4553 c żōnōm .
SFX 4554 N 1
SFX 4554 c żōnych .
SFX 4555 N 1
SFX 4555 c żōnyj .
SFX 4556 N 1
SFX 4556 c żōnymi .
SFX 4557 N 1
SFX 4557 c żōnymu .
SFX 4558 N 1
SFX 4558 c żōnym .
SFX 4559 N 1
SFX 4559 c żōny .
SFX 4560 N 1
SFX 4560 c żymy .
SFX 4561 N 1
SFX 4561 c żyniach .
SFX 4562 N 1
SFX 4562 c żyniami .
SFX 4563 N 1
SFX 4563 c żynia .
SFX 4564 N 1
SFX 4564 c żynie .
SFX 4565 N 1
SFX 4565 c żynio .
SFX 4566 N 1
SFX 4566 c żyniōm .
SFX 4567 N 1
SFX 4567 c żyniu .
SFX 4568 N 1
SFX 4568 c żyni .
SFX 4569 N 1
SFX 4569 c żyniym .
SFX 4570 N 1
SFX 4570 c żyń .
SFX 4571 N 1
SFX 4571 ać uja .
SFX 4572 N 1
SFX 4572 ać ujcie .
SFX 4573 N 1
SFX 4573 ać ujecie .
SFX 4574 N 1
SFX 4574 ać ujesz .
SFX 4575 N 1
SFX 4575 ać uje .
SFX 4576 N 1
SFX 4576 ać ujmy .
SFX 4577 N 1
SFX 4577 ać ujōm .
SFX 4578 N 1
SFX 4578 ać ujōncego .
SFX 4579 N 1
SFX 4579 ać ujōnce .
SFX 4580 N 1
SFX 4580 ać ujōnco .
SFX 4581 N 1
SFX 4581 ać ujōncōm .
SFX 4582 N 1
SFX 4582 ać ujōnc .
SFX 4583 N 1
SFX 4583 ać ujōncych .
SFX 4584 N 1
SFX 4584 ać ujōncyj .
SFX 4585 N 1
SFX 4585 ać ujōncymi .
SFX 4586 N 1
SFX 4586 ać ujōncymu .
SFX 4587 N 1
SFX 4587 ać ujōncym .
SFX 4588 N 1
SFX 4588 ać ujōncy .
SFX 4589 N 1
SFX 4589 ać uj .
SFX 4590 N 1
SFX 4590 ać ujymy .
SFX 4591 N 1
SFX 4591 iwać uja .
SFX 4592 N 1
SFX 4592 iwać ujcie .
SFX 4593 N 1
SFX 4593 iwać ujecie .
SFX 4594 N 1
SFX 4594 iwać ujesz .
SFX 4595 N 1
SFX 4595 iwać uje .
SFX 4596 N 1
SFX 4596 iwać ujmy .
SFX 4597 N 1
SFX 4597 iwać ujōm .
SFX 4598 N 1
SFX 4598 iwać ujōncego .
SFX 4599 N 1
SFX 4599 iwać ujōnce .
SFX 4600 N 1
SFX 4600 iwać ujōnco .
SFX 4601 N 1
SFX 4601 iwać ujōncōm .
SFX 4602 N 1
SFX 4602 iwać ujōnc .
SFX 4603 N 1
SFX 4603 iwać ujōncych .
SFX 4604 N 1
SFX 4604 iwać ujōncyj .
SFX 4605 N 1
SFX 4605 iwać ujōncymi .
SFX 4606 N 1
SFX 4606 iwać ujōncymu .
SFX 4607 N 1
SFX 4607 iwać ujōncym .
SFX 4608 N 1
SFX 4608 iwać ujōncy .
SFX 4609 N 1
SFX 4609 iwać uj .
SFX 4610 N 1
SFX 4610 orzić arciach .
SFX 4611 N 1
SFX 4611 orzić arciami .
SFX 4612 N 1
SFX 4612 orzić arcia .
SFX 4613 N 1
SFX 4613 orzić arcie .
SFX 4614 N 1
SFX 4614 orzić arcio .
SFX 4615 N 1
SFX 4615 orzić arciōm .
SFX 4616 N 1
SFX 4616 orzić arciu .
SFX 4617 N 1
SFX 4617 orzić arci .
SFX 4618 N 1
SFX 4618 orzić arciym .
SFX 4619 N 1
SFX 4619 orzić arć .
SFX 4620 N 1
SFX 4620 orzić arlichmy .
SFX 4621 N 1
SFX 4621 orzić arliście .
SFX 4622 N 1
SFX 4622 orzić arli .
SFX 4623 N 1
SFX 4623 orzić arłach .
SFX 4624 N 1
SFX 4624 orzić arłaś .
SFX 4625 N 1
SFX 4625 orzić arła .
SFX 4626 N 1
SFX 4626 orzić arłech .
SFX 4627 N 1
SFX 4627 orzić arłeś .
SFX 4628 N 1
SFX 4628 orzić arło .
SFX 4629 N 1
SFX 4629 orzić arłychmy .
SFX 4630 N 1
SFX 4630 orzić arłyście .
SFX 4631 N 1
SFX 4631 orzić arły .
SFX 4632 N 1
SFX 4632 orzić artego .
SFX 4633 N 1
SFX 4633 orzić arte .
SFX 4634 N 1
SFX 4634 orzić arto .
SFX 4635 N 1
SFX 4635 orzić artōm .
SFX 4636 N 1
SFX 4636 orzić artych .
SFX 4637 N 1
SFX 4637 orzić artyj .
SFX 4638 N 1
SFX 4638 orzić artymi .
SFX 4639 N 1
SFX 4639 orzić artymu .
SFX 4640 N 1
SFX 4640 orzić artym .
SFX 4641 N 1
SFX 4641 orzić arty .
SFX 4642 N 1
SFX 4642 orzić ar .
SFX 4643 N 1
SFX 4643 ca iec .
SFX 4644 N 1
SFX 4644 ies sach .
SFX 4645 N 1
SFX 4645 ies sami .
SFX 4646 N 1
SFX 4646 ies sa .
SFX 4647 N 1
SFX 4647 ies sie .
SFX 4648 N 1
SFX 4648 ies sowi .
SFX 4649 N 1
SFX 4649 ies sōm .
SFX 4650 N 1
SFX 4650 ies sōw .
SFX 4651 N 1
SFX 4651 ies sym .
SFX 4652 N 1
SFX 4652 ies sy .
PFX 4653 N 1
PFX 4653 ôz ôź .
SFX 4654 N 1
SFX 4654 ziym źmiōma .
SFX 4655 N 1
SFX 4655 ziym źmiu .
PFX 4656 N 1
PFX 4656 ôziym ôźmiōma .
PFX 4657 N 1
PFX 4657 ôziym ôźmiu .
SFX 4658 N 1
SFX 4658 ni ń .
SFX 4659 N 1
SFX 4659 a iyn .
SFX 4660 N 1
SFX 4660 et ta .
SFX 4661 Y 1
SFX 4661 ć 0 .
PFX 4661 Y 1
PFX 4661 pedz powiyc .
SFX 4662 Y 1
SFX 4662 ieć cie .
PFX 4662 Y 1
PFX 4662 pe powiy .
SFX 4663 Y 1
SFX 4663 ieć my .
PFX 4663 Y 1
PFX 4663 pe powiy .
SFX 4664 Y 1
SFX 4664 ieć 0 .
PFX 4664 Y 1
PFX 4664 pe powiy .
SFX 4665 N 1
SFX 4665 e ych .
SFX 4666 N 1
SFX 4666 e ymi .
SFX 4667 N 1
SFX 4667 e ymu .
SFX 4668 N 1
SFX 4668 oła ōł .
SFX 4669 Y 1
SFX 4669 s 0 .
PFX 4669 Y 1
PFX 4669 p ps .
PFX 4670 N 1
PFX 4670 0 noj .
SFX 4671 N 1
SFX 4671 ōndz yndzmi .
SFX 4672 N 1
SFX 4672 ōndz yndzy .
SFX 4673 N 1
SFX 4673 0 za .
SFX 4674 N 1
SFX 4674 0 zōncego .
SFX 4675 N 1
SFX 4675 0 zōnce .
SFX 4676 N 1
SFX 4676 0 zōnco .
SFX 4677 N 1
SFX 4677 0 zōncōm .
SFX 4678 N 1
SFX 4678 0 zōnc .
SFX 4679 N 1
SFX 4679 0 zōncych .
SFX 4680 N 1
SFX 4680 0 zōncyj .
SFX 4681 N 1
SFX 4681 0 zōncymi .
SFX 4682 N 1
SFX 4682 0 zōncymu .
SFX 4683 N 1
SFX 4683 0 zōncym .
SFX 4684 N 1
SFX 4684 0 zōncy .
SFX 4685 N 1
SFX 4685 iys sach .
SFX 4686 N 1
SFX 4686 iys sami .
SFX 4687 N 1
SFX 4687 iys sa .
SFX 4688 N 1
SFX 4688 iys sie .
SFX 4689 N 1
SFX 4689 iys sowi .
SFX 4690 N 1
SFX 4690 iys sōm .
SFX 4691 N 1
SFX 4691 iys sōw .
SFX 4692 N 1
SFX 4692 iys sym .
SFX 4693 N 1
SFX 4693 iys sy .
SFX 4694 N 1
SFX 4694 znōńć źniecie .
SFX 4695 N 1
SFX 4695 znōńć źniesz .
SFX 4696 N 1
SFX 4696 znōńć źnie .
SFX 4697 N 1
SFX 4697 znōńć źnijcie .
SFX 4698 N 1
SFX 4698 znōńć źnijmy .
SFX 4699 N 1
SFX 4699 znōńć źnij .
SFX 4700 N 1
SFX 4700 znōńć źniynci .
SFX 4701 N 1
SFX 4701 znōńć źniyntego .
SFX 4702 N 1
SFX 4702 znōńć źniynte .
SFX 4703 N 1
SFX 4703 znōńć źniynto .
SFX 4704 N 1
SFX 4704 znōńć źniyntōm .
SFX 4705 N 1
SFX 4705 znōńć źniyntych .
SFX 4706 N 1
SFX 4706 znōńć źniyntyj .
SFX 4707 N 1
SFX 4707 znōńć źniyntymi .
SFX 4708 N 1
SFX 4708 znōńć źniyntymu .
SFX 4709 N 1
SFX 4709 znōńć źniyntym .
SFX 4710 N 1
SFX 4710 znōńć źniynty .
SFX 4711 N 1
SFX 4711 znōńć źniyńciach .
SFX 4712 N 1
SFX 4712 znōńć źniyńciami .
SFX 4713 N 1
SFX 4713 znōńć źniyńcia .
SFX 4714 N 1
SFX 4714 znōńć źniyńcie .
SFX 4715 N 1
SFX 4715 znōńć źniyńcio .
SFX 4716 N 1
SFX 4716 znōńć źniyńciōm .
SFX 4717 N 1
SFX 4717 znōńć źniyńciu .
