src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.dic
pani/1,2,108,6,4658
pannna/83,86,127,4659,103,104,106
paznoket/4440,4441,4442,4660,4443,4444,4445,4447,4448
pedzieć/2333,489,490,491,492,493,494,495,496,497,498,499,500,501,502,503,1101,1102,1103,504,1104,1105,1106,1107,1108,1109,1110,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,2334,1114,2335,1127,1128,1129,1130,1131,1132,1133,1134,1135,4661,4662,4663,4664,2340,2341,2342,2343
petrolyj/1586,1587,1589,1590,1591,1592,1593,1594,4514
pieczōne/84,4665,4666,4667,436
pierdoła/109,83,86,103,104,110,106,4668
pies/4644,4645,4646,4669,4648,4649,4650,4651,4652
pieślawij/4670
pijōndz/1,3,108,5,6,10,8,4671,4672
piniōndz/1,3,108,5,6,10,8,4671,4672
piys/4685,4686,4687,4688,4689,4690,4691,4692,4693
piznōńć/176,203,204,205,206,207,208,209,210,1136,1137,1138,1139,1140,1141,1142,1143,1144,1145,1146,1147,1148,1149,1150,1151,1152,1153,1154,1155,1156,1157,211,4694,4695,4696,4697,4698,4699,4700,4701,4702,4703,4704,4705,4706,4707,4708,4709,4710,4711,4712,4713,4714,4715,4716,4717,4718,4719
pokroć/4491,4492,4493,4494,4495,4496,4497,4498,4499,4500,4501,4502,4503,4504,4505,4506,4507,4508,4509,4510,4511,4512,558,790,791,792,410,562,793,794,795,796,797,798,799,800,801,802,1892,1893,803,804,805,806,807,808,809,1894,810,811,1895,1896,1897,1898,1899,1900,1901,812
przoć/4980,4981,4982,4983,4984,4985,4986,4987,4988,4989,4990,4991,4992,4993,4994,4995,4996,4491,4492,4493,4494,4495,4496,4497,4498,4499,4500,4501,4502,4503,4504,4505,4506,4507,4508,4509,4510,4511,4512,1882,1884,1888,1890,793,794,795,796,797,798,799,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,44,53
pszczoła/109,83,86,103,104,106,4668
szkoła/109,83,86,103,104,106,4668
słabnōńć/154,155,156,157,158,159,160,161,162,163,164,165,166,167,168,169,170,171,172,173,174,175,176,177,178,179,180,181,182,183,184,185,186,187,188,189,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,205,206,207,208,209,210,211,4532,4533
tuste/84,4665,4666,4667,436
tōłōw/4515,4516,5231,397,4517,4518,4519,4520,4521
Ôlesno/99,100,101,4513
ôko/4486,4487,4488,4489,4490,99,100,101
ôkroć/4491,4492,4493,4494,4495,4496,4497,4498,4499,4500,4501,4502,4503,4504,4505,4506,4507,4508,4509,4510,4511,4512,558,790,791,792,410,562,793,794,795,796,797,798,799,800,801,802,1892,1893,803,804,805,806,807,808,809,1894,810,811,1895,1896,1897,1898,1899,1900,1901,812
ôlyj/1586,1587,1589,1590,1591,1592,1593,1594,4514
ôsioł/4522,4523,4524,4525,4526,4527,4528,4529,4530,4531
ôstrzeliwać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,4571,4572,4573,4574,4575,4576,4577,4578,4579,4580,4581,4582,4583,4584,4585,4586,4587,4588,4589,4590
ôszukiwać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,4591,4592,4593,4594,4595,4596,4597,4598,4599,4600,4601,4602,4603,4604,4605,4606,4607,4608,4609
ôsłabnōńć/154,155,156,157,158,159,160,161,162,163,164,165,166,167,168,169,170,171,172,173,174,175,176,177,178,179,180,181,182,183,184,185,186,187,188,189,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,205,206,207,208,209,210,211,4532,4533
ôwca/83,86,132,103,104,106,4643
ôwies/4644,4645,4646,4647,4648,4649,4650,4651,4652
ôziym/4653,4654,4655
ôziymset/4656,4657
ôłōw/4515,4516,397,4517,4518,4519,4520,4521
